test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+21+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsinaaning
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+21+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+21+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+2Pl+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsiwaang
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyiniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsiniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinyibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinsibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiinyibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiinyibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiinsibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiinsibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiimishinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+21: gimiskweyaabiimishinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimiskweyaabiimishiwaa
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omiskweyaabiimishini
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omiskweyaabiimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimiskweyaabiimishiban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiimishidig, nimiskweyaabiimishidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimiskweyaabiimishiban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiimishidig, gimiskweyaabiimishidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: omiskweyaabiimishiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiimishidig, omiskweyaabiimishidog]
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: imiskweyaabiimishiban
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imiskweyaabiimishidig, imiskweyaabiimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimiskweyaabiimishing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: nimiskweyaabiimishan
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimiskweyaabiimishan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimiskweyaabiimishing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: gimiskweyaabiimishan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimiskweyaabiimishan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: omiskweyaabiimishing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: omiskweyaabiimishan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: omiskweyaabiimishan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: imiskweyaabiimishing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: imiskweyaabiimishan
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: imiskweyaabiimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nimiskweyaabiiminaaniban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21+Pret: gimiskweyaabiiminaaniban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gimiskweyaabiimiwaaban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiimiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret: omiskweyaabiiminiiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiiminiidig, omiskweyaabiiminiidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret: omiskweyaabiimiwaaban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiimiwaadig, omiskweyaabiimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nimiskweyaabiiminaaning
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nimiskweyaabiiminaanin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nimiskweyaabiiminaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21+Loc: gimiskweyaabiiminaaning
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21+Obv: gimiskweyaabiiminaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+21+Pl: gimiskweyaabiiminaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gimiskweyaabiimiwaang
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiimiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiimiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiiminiing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiiminiin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiiminiin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiimiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiimiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiimiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiimibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiimibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiimibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiimibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiimibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiimibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiimibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiimibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiimibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiimibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiimibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimiskweyaabiishinaaniban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Pret: gimiskweyaabiishinaaniban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimiskweyaabiishiwaaban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omiskweyaabiishiniiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiishiniidig, omiskweyaabiishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omiskweyaabiishiwaaban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimiskweyaabiishinaaning
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimiskweyaabiishinaanin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimiskweyaabiishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishinaaning
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishiwaang
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiishiniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiishiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiishibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiishibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiishibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiishibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinaanibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimiskweyaabiinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimiskweyaabiinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimiskweyaabiinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinaanibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiiwaabaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiiniibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiiniidig, omiskweyaabiiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiiniidig, omiskweyaabiiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiiniidig, omiskweyaabiiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiiwaabaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiiwaadig, omiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiiwaadig, omiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiiwaadig, omiskweyaabiiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: miskweyaabiinyishibaniing
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: miskweyaabiinyishibaniin
     miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: miskweyaabiinyishibaniin
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: miskweyaabiinsishibaniing
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: miskweyaabiinsishibaniin
     miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: miskweyaabiinsishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaan
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaan
